Utah statutes.
53-6-213.   Appropriations from reparation fund.

(1)  The Legislature shall appropriate from the fund established in Title 63M, Chapter 7, Part 5, Utah Office for Victims of Crime, to the division, funds for training of law enforcement officers in the state.

(2)  The department shall make an annual report to the Legislature, which includes the amount received during the previous fiscal year.

